Washington statutes.
RCW 4.60.020

Confession by public and private corporations and minors.

When the action is against the state, a county or other public corporation therein, or a private corporation, or a minor, the confession shall be made by the person who at the time sustains the relation to such state, corporation, county or minor, as would authorize the service of a notice summons upon him or her; or in the case of a minor, if a guardian for the action has been appointed, then by such guardian; in all other cases the confession shall be made by the defendant in person.

[ 2011 c 336 s 112; Code 1881 s 292; 1877 p 60 s 296; 1869 p 72 s 294; RRS s 414.]